apertium-kir.kir.lexc
LEXICON V-INFL-TV

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-INFL-COMMON ;
! FIXME: When we make it cyclical, this should really be V-INFL-TV
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-INFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р V-INFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р%>%{D%}%{I%}р V-INFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>%<pass%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р%>%{I%}%{l%} V-INFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>%<caus%>:%>%{I%}%{l%}%>%{D%}%{I%}р V-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-INFL-TV-NOPASS

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-INFL-TV-PASS

%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>: V-INFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р V-INFL-COMMON ;


LEXICON V-INFL-IV

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-INFL-COMMON ;
! FIXME: When we make it cyclical, this should really be V-INFL-TV
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р V-INFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р%>%{D%}%{I%}р V-INFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>%<pass%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р%>%{I%}%{l%} V-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-INFL-TV-NO-CAUS

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-INFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-INFL-COMMON ;


LEXICON V-INFL-TV-IRREG-CAUS

%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%> V-INFL-COMMON ;                                    !
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р V-INFL-COMMON ;                                    !
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-INFL-COMMON ;                             !  FIXME: When we make it cyclical, this should really be V-INFL-TV

LEXICON V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS

%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%> V-INFL-COMMON ;                                    !
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р V-INFL-COMMON ;                                    !
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-INFL-COMMON ;                             !  FIXME: When we make it cyclical, this should really be V-INFL-TV

LEXICON VAUX-INFL

%<vaux%>: V-INFL-COMMON ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                  L E X I C O N    E N T R I E S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Miscellaneous
!
! ! FIXME: сыяктуу and экен have special grammar, but are ~modal particles
! сыяктуу:сыяктуу PART ; ! modal particle; adjective, usually with dative "similar to"
! экен:экен PART ; ! non-eyewitness modal particle
! экен:экен PART-PERS-COP ; ! non-eyewitness modal particle
! !эле PART-PERS-PAST ; !
!
! ! FIXME: Add the other forms as Dir/LR
бы%<qst%>:%~бы # ; ! Dir/RL
бы%<qst%>:бы # ; ! Dir/LR
бекен%<qst%>:%~бекен # ; ! Dir/RL
бекен%<qst%>:бекен # ; ! Dir/LR
го%<mod_ass%>:%~го # ; ! Dir/RL
го%<mod_ass%>:го # ; ! Dir/LR
чы%<qst%>:чы # ;

LEXICON Postadverbs

гана:гана POSTADV ; ! "only"
эле:эле POSTADV ; ! "only"
деле:деле POSTADV ; ! "even"
деле:дале POSTADV ; ! "even" ! FIXME: treat as separate word or as dialectal variant
дагы:дагы POSTADV ; ! "... дагы" = "and ... too"
ашуун:ашуун POSTADV ; ! "more than"
ашык:ашык POSTADV ; ! "more than"
тең:тең POSTADV ; ! "~both" e.g., экөө тең
болсо:болсо POSTADV ; ! "as for"

LEXICON AdjectivePrefixes

%[%-red%]:%{redC%}%{redV%}п%> Adjectives ;
%[%-red%]:%{redC%}%{redV%}п%-%> Adjectives ; ! Dir/LR


LEXICON Copula

э%<cop%>%<ger_past%>:экен POSSESSION ;
э%<cop%>%<ger_perf%>:экен%>%{L%}%{I%}к POSSESSION ;

э%<cop%>%<aor%>%<evid%>:экен V-PERS-COP-SUF ;
э%<cop%>%<aor%>%<evid%>%[%-qst%]:бекен V-PERS-COP-SUF ;
э%<cop%>%<neg%>%<aor%>%<evid%>:эмес% экен V-PERS-COP-SUF ;

э%<cop%>%<ifi%>:эле V-PERS-PAST ;
э%<cop%>%<ifi%>%[%-qst%]:беле V-PERS-PAST ;

э%<cop%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:эмес V-PERS-COP-SUF ;

э%<cop%>%<aor%>: V-PERS-COP-SUF ; ! Dir/RL ! for below reason?
э%<cop%>%<aor%>%<p3%>%<sg%>: # ; ! Dir/RL ! to generate nothing if attached to an unknown form
э%<cop%>%<aor%>%<p3%>%<pl%>: # ; ! Dir/RL


LEXICON Interjections

албетте:албетте INTERJ ; ! "of course"
мына:мына INTERJ ; ! "here is, вот"
ооба:ооба INTERJ ; ! "yes"
жок:жок INTERJ ; ! "no"
эй:эй INTERJ ; ! "hey"
!ананчы INTERJ ; ! "of course"
макул:макул INTERJ ; ! "fine/okay"
мейли:мейли INTERJ ; ! "okay/fine"
түшүнүктүү:түшүнүктүү INTERJ ; ! "understood"
ме:ме INTERJ ; ! "here you go / take"
жарайт:жарайт INTERJ ;
болуптур:болуптур INTERJ ;
анда:анда INTERJ ;
андай% болсо:андай% болсо INTERJ ;
демек:демек INTERJ ;
э:э INTERJ ;
аттигиниң:аттигиниң INTERJ ;
аттиң:аттиң INTERJ ;
аттигинай:аттигинай INTERJ ;
баракелде:баракелде INTERJ ;
баса:баса INTERJ ;
айтмакчы:айтмакчы INTERJ ;
балким:балким INTERJ ;
бирок:бирок INTERJ ;
маселен:маселен INTERJ ;
мисалы:мисалы INTERJ ;
дурус:дурус INTERJ ; ! FIXME: check
туура:туура INTERJ ;
кана:кана INTERJ ;
кош:кош INTERJ ;
Кудай%-ай:Кудай%-ай INTERJ ;
ой:ой INTERJ ;
о:о INTERJ ;
оу:оу INTERJ ;
ойбой:ойбой INTERJ ;
рахмат:рахмат INTERJ ; ! "thank you"
рахмат:ырахмат INTERJ ; ! "thank you" ! Dir/LR
апей:апей INTERJ ; ! ""

аттиң% ай:аттиң% ай INTERJ ; ! ""


LEXICON Punctuation

.%<sent%>:. # ;
..%<sent%>:.. # ;
...%<sent%>:... # ;
%;%<sent%>:%; # ;
%:%<sent%>:%: # ;
%!%<sent%>:%! # ;
%-%<guio%>:%- # ;
%—%<guio%>:%— # ;
,%<cm%>:, # ;
%?%<sent%>:%? # ;
%'%<apos%>:%' # ;
%"%<quot%>:%" # ;
%«%<lquot%>:%« # ;
%»%<rquot%>:%» # ;
%”%<rquot%>:%” # ;
%“%<lquot%>:%“ # ;
%(%<lpar%>:%( # ;
%]%<rpar%>:%] # ;
%[%<lpar%>:%[ # ;
%)%<rpar%>:%) # ;
\%<sent%>:\ # ;
/%<sent%>:/ # ;


!==============!
 LEXICON Digits ! Use/Circ
!==============!

%0:%0 NUM ;  ! Use/Circ
№:№ DIGITLEX ;  ! Use/Circ
DIGITLEX ; ! Use/Circ
LASTDIGIT ; ! Use/Circ
LASTDIGIT-REST ; ! Use/Circ

LEXICON NP-UNK

%<np%>%<unk%>: # ;

LEXICON GUESS-QUEUE

<(a | b | c | d | e | f | g | h | i | j | k | l | m | n | o | p | q | r | s | t | u | v | w | x | y | z)+> NP-UNK ;

LEXICON Guesser

A:A GUESS-QUEUE ;
B:B GUESS-QUEUE ;
C:C GUESS-QUEUE ;
D:D GUESS-QUEUE ;
E:E GUESS-QUEUE ;
F:F GUESS-QUEUE ;
G:G GUESS-QUEUE ;
H:H GUESS-QUEUE ;
I:I GUESS-QUEUE ;
J:J GUESS-QUEUE ;
K:K GUESS-QUEUE ;
L:L GUESS-QUEUE ;
M:M GUESS-QUEUE ;
N:N GUESS-QUEUE ;
O:O GUESS-QUEUE ;
P:P GUESS-QUEUE ;
Q:Q GUESS-QUEUE ;
R:R GUESS-QUEUE ;
S:S GUESS-QUEUE ;
T:T GUESS-QUEUE ;
U:U GUESS-QUEUE ;
V:V GUESS-QUEUE ;
W:W GUESS-QUEUE ;
X:X GUESS-QUEUE ;
Y:Y GUESS-QUEUE ;
Z:Z GUESS-QUEUE ;

LEXICON NO-DICT-END

%<n%>%<unk%>: SUBST-NONOM ;
й%<n%>%<unk%>: й SUBST-NONOM ;
%<v%>%<unk%>: V-INFL-COMMON-ND ;
й%<v%>%<unk%>: й V-INFL-COMMON-ND ;

LEXICON GUESS-QUEUE-KYR

<( j | а | б | в | г | д | е | ё | ж | з | и | к | л | м | н | ң | о | ө | п | р | с | т | у | ү | ф | х | ц | ч | ш | щ | ы | ь | э | ъ | ю | я)+> NO-DICT-END ;

LEXICON Verbs
жат:жат VAUX-INFL ; !
жат:ат VAUX-INFL ; ! Dir/LR
кал:кал VAUX-INFL ; !
жүр:жүр VAUX-INFL ; !
ал:ал VAUX-INFL ; !
отур:отур VAUX-INFL ; !
тур:тур VAUX-INFL ; !
сал:сал VAUX-INFL ; !
кет:кет VAUX-INFL ; !
чык:чык VAUX-INFL ; !
бер:бер VAUX-INFL ; !
бол:бол VAUX-INFL ; !
бүт:бүт VAUX-INFL ; !
башта:башта VAUX-INFL ; !
жазда:жазда VAUX-INFL ; !
кел:кел VAUX-INFL ; !
айлан:айландыр V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; !
ас:ас V-INFL-TV ; ! "hang"
аш:аш V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "pass/exceed"
аш:ашыр V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "make exceed"
бүт:бүт V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "to finish"
бүт:бүтүр V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "to finish"
жат:жат V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "lie"
жат:жаткыз V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "lie down"
зыян% кел:зыян% кел V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "for harm to come"
зыян% кел:зыян% келтир V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "to cause harm"
кел:кел V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "come"
кел:келтир V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "make come"
кет:кет V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "go away / leave"
кет:кетир V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "to make leave"
кой:кой V-INFL-TV ; ! "put, place"
күл:күл V-INFL-IV ; ! "smile, laugh"
таң% ат:таң% ат V-INFL-TV ; ! "dawn"
тий:тийгиз V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "make touch"
тур:тур V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "stand, live"
тур:тургуз V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "stand up (trans)"
ук:ук V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "listen"
ук:угуз V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "make listen"
өл:өл V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "die"
өл:өлтүр V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "kill"
өт:өт V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "pass by"
өт:өт V-INFL-TV-NO-CAUS ; ! "pass, conduct"
өт:өткөр V-INFL-TV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "pass, conduct"
өт:өткөз V-INFL-TV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "pass, conduct"  ! Dir/LR
ак:ак V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "flow"
ак:агыз V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "make flow"
отур:отур V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "sit"
олтур:олтур V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "sit"              ! Dir/LR
отур:отургуз V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "sit"
олтур:олтургуз V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "sit"  ! Dir/LR
була:була V-INFL-TV ;
быш:быш V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "cook" / "be cooked"
быш:бышыр V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "cook"
кий:кий V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "get dressed"
кий:кийгиз V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "dress"
жан:жан V-INFL-IV ;
жон:жон V-INFL-TV ;
кал:кал V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "stay, remain"
кал:калтыр V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "leave (behind)"
кеч:кеч V-INFL-TV ;
кир:кир V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "enter"
кир:киргиз V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "put in, enter (e.g. data)"
күй:күй V-INFL-IV ; ! "burn"
көч:көч V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "move"
көч:көчүр V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "make move"
көр:көр V-INFL-TV-NOPASS ; ! "see"
көр:көрүн V-INFL-TV-PASS ; ! "be seen"
көр:көр%>%{G%}%{A%}з V-INFL-TV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "understand"
көрсөт:көрсөт V-INFL-TV ; ! "show"
сүз:сүз V-INFL-TV ;
сүйлө:сүйлө V-INFL-IV ; ! "speak"
таң% кал:таң% кал V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "be surprised"
таң% кал:таң% калтыр V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "surprise"
төмөнсүн:төмөнсүн V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "to feel down"
төмөнсүн:төмөнсүнт V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "to make _ feel down"
тосуп% ал:тосуп% ал V-INFL-TV ;
түш:түш V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "fall"
түш:түшүр V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "to make fall"
чарча:чарча V-INFL-IV ;
чеч:чеч V-INFL-TV ;
чык:чык V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "to exit/leave"
чык:чыгар V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "to take/put/move [object] out"
өч:өч V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "turn off"
өч:өчүр V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "make turn off"
кат:кат V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "get hard"
ээле:ээле V-INFL-TV ; ! "occupy"
улан:улан V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ;
улан:улант V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! Dir/LR
коп:коп V-INFL-IV ;
тапта:тапта V-INFL-TV ;
жет:жет V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ;
жет:жеткир V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ;
чогул:чогул V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ;
чогул:чогулт V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ;
сат:сат V-INFL-TV ;
күчө:күчө V-INFL-IV ;
айыпта:айыпта V-INFL-TV ;
түшүн:түшүн V-INFL-TV-NO-CAUS ; ! "understand"
түшүн:түшүндүр V-INFL-TV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "understand"
эт:эт V-INFL-IV ;
чоңой:чоңой V-INFL-TV ;
көп% иште:көп% иште V-INFL-IV ;   ! "work a lot"   ! Use/Trmorph
тирке:тирке V-INFL-TV ;
бак:бак V-INFL-TV ; ! "look after"
далай:далай V-INFL-IV ; ! "wither"
ачылыш% жаса:ачылыш% жаса V-INFL-IV ;
көм:көм V-INFL-TV ;
арыкта:арыкта V-INFL-IV ;
тил:тил V-INFL-IV ; ! CHECK: not TV?
сүйүнчүлө:сүйүнчүлө V-INFL-IV ;
чайка:чайка V-INFL-TV ;
баш% тарт:баш% тарт V-INFL-IV ;
кана:кана V-INFL-IV ;
тизмеле:тизмеле V-INFL-TV ;
тирил:тирил V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ;  ! "come to live"
тирил:тирилт V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ;  ! "revive"
бакыр:бакыр V-INFL-IV ; ! "shout"
жылып% жок% бол:жылып% жок% бол V-INFL-TV ;
аныкта:аныкта V-INFL-IV ;
эске% кел:эске% кел V-INFL-IV ;
сейректе:сейректе V-INFL-IV ;
аткара% ал:аткара% ал V-INFL-IV ;
сыйры:сыйры V-INFL-TV ;
кыймылда:кыймылда V-INFL-IV ;
суран:суран V-INFL-IV ;
себеле:себеле V-INFL-TV ;
кыймылда:кыймылда V-INFL-IV ;
төп% кел:төп% кел V-INFL-TV ;
жийиркен:жийиркен V-INFL-IV ;
жанчы:жанчы V-INFL-TV ;
сөк:сөк V-INFL-IV ;
индексте:индексте V-INFL-TV ;
соорон:соорон V-INFL-IV ;
ая:ая V-INFL-TV ;
конуштан:конуштан V-INFL-IV ; ! ""
жалт% кара:жалт% кара V-INFL-TV ; ! "glance at / look at [suddenly]"
LEXICON NoDictionary
В:В GUESS-QUEUE-KYR ;
Д:Д GUESS-QUEUE-KYR ;
Ё:Ё GUESS-QUEUE-KYR ;
З:З GUESS-QUEUE-KYR ;
J:J GUESS-QUEUE-KYR ;
Л:Л GUESS-QUEUE-KYR ;
Н:Н GUESS-QUEUE-KYR ;
О:О GUESS-QUEUE-KYR ;
П:П GUESS-QUEUE-KYR ;
С:С GUESS-QUEUE-KYR ;
У:У GUESS-QUEUE-KYR ;
Ф:Ф GUESS-QUEUE-KYR ;
Ц:Ц GUESS-QUEUE-KYR ;
Ш:Ш GUESS-QUEUE-KYR ;
Ы:Ы GUESS-QUEUE-KYR ;
Ю:Ю GUESS-QUEUE-KYR ;
а:а GUESS-QUEUE-KYR ;
в:в GUESS-QUEUE-KYR ;
д:д GUESS-QUEUE-KYR ;
ё:ё GUESS-QUEUE-KYR ;
з:з GUESS-QUEUE-KYR ;
j:j GUESS-QUEUE-KYR ;
л:л GUESS-QUEUE-KYR ;
н:н GUESS-QUEUE-KYR ;
п:п GUESS-QUEUE-KYR ;
у:у GUESS-QUEUE-KYR ;
ц:ц GUESS-QUEUE-KYR ;
ы:ы GUESS-QUEUE-KYR ;
